Virginia statutes. Title 6.2. Financial Institutions and Services.
Chapter 15. Consumer Finance Companies.
§ 6.2-1523.1.
Access partners.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §§

6.2-1501

and

6.2-1518

, a licensee may use the services of one or more access partners, provided that all of the following conditions are met:

All loans made in connection with an access partner comply with the requirements of this chapter.

The licensee maintains a written agreement with each access partner. The written agreement shall (i) require the access partner to comply with this section and all rules adopted under this section regarding the activities of access partners; (ii) give the Commission access to the access partner’s books and records pertaining to the access partner’s operations under the agreement with the licensee in accordance with §

6.2-1533

and authority to examine the access partner pursuant to §

6.2-1531

; (iii) prohibit the access partner from charging or accepting any fees or compensation in connection with a loan from any person, other than what the licensee pays to the access partner under the terms of the contract; and (iv) require the access partner to keep written records sufficient to ensure compliance with this chapter, including records of all loan disbursements and loan payments for at least three years.

A licensee shall conduct a due diligence review of all access partners. The due diligence shall include a review of the access partner’s financial soundness and legal compliance and the criminal history of the access partner and its employees. A licensee shall be responsible for implementing and maintaining a reasonable risk-based supervision program to monitor its access partners. The licensee shall provide to the Commission any information relating to the access partners as the Commissioner prescribes. Such information shall be provided in a form and manner as prescribed by the Commissioner.

The services of an access partner shall be limited to (i) distributing written materials or providing written factual information about loans that has been prepared or authorized in writing by the licensee; (ii) explaining the loan application process to prospective borrowers or assisting applicants to complete a loan application according to procedures the licensee approves; (iii) processing credit applications provided by the licensee, which applications shall clearly state that the licensee is the lender and disclose the licensee’s contact information and how to submit complaints to the Commission; (iv) communicating with the licensee or the applicant about the status of applications; (v) obtaining the borrower’s signature on documents prepared by the licensee and delivering final documents to the borrower; (vi) disbursing loan proceeds or receiving loan payments, provided the access partner provides a plain and complete written receipt at the time each disbursement or payment is made; and (vii) operating electronic access points through which a prospective borrower may directly access the website of the licensee to apply for a loan.

An access partner shall not (i) provide counseling or advice to a borrower or prospective borrower with respect to any loan term; (ii) provide loan-related marketing material that has not previously been approved by the licensee; (iii) negotiate a loan term between a licensee and a prospective borrower; (iv) offer information pertaining to a single prospective borrower to more than one licensee, except that if a licensee has declined to offer a loan to a prospective borrower in writing the access partner may offer information pertaining to that borrower to another licensee with whom it has an access partner agreement; or (v) offer information pertaining to any prospective borrower to any person or entity other than a licensee operating under this chapter, subject to clause (iv).

A licensee shall apply any payment a borrower makes to an access partner as of the date on which the payment is received by the access partner.

A licensee shall not (i) hold a borrower liable for a failure or delay by an access partner in transmitting a payment to the licensee; (ii) knowingly conduct business with an access partner that has solicited or accepted fees or compensation in connection with a licensee’s loan other than what is specified in the written agreement described in subdivision 2; or (iii) directly or indirectly pass on to a borrower any fee or other compensation that a licensee pays to an access partner in connection with such borrower’s loan.

A licensee shall be responsible for any act of its access partner if such act would violate any provision of this chapter.

The Commission may (i) bar a licensee that violates any part of this chapter from using the services of specified access partners, or access partners generally; (ii) subject a licensee to disciplinary action for any violation of this chapter committed by a contracted access partner; or (iii) bar any person who violates the requirements of this chapter from performing services pursuant to this chapter generally or at particular locations.

The Commission shall have the authority to conduct investigation and examination of access partners, provided the scope of any investigation or examination shall be limited to those books, accounts, records, documents, materials, and matters reasonably necessary to determine compliance with this chapter.

An access partner location shall not be considered an office for purposes of §

6.2-1508.1

.

An access partner shall not be required to be licensed under Chapter 19 (§

6.2-1900

et seq.) to provide the services of an access partner described in subdivision A 4.

History.

2020, cc. 1215, 1258.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1215 and 1258, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2021, except that the database required by §

6.2-1810

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall be modified to accommodate the provisions of this first enactment of this act by January 1, 2022.”

§ 6.2-1523.2.
Application of chapter to Internet loans.

The provisions of this chapter, including specifically the licensure requirements of §

6.2-1501

, shall apply to persons making loans over the Internet to Virginia residents or any individuals in Virginia, whether or not the person maintains a physical presence in the Commonwealth.

The Commission may, from time to time, by administrative rule or policy statement, set requirements that the Commission reasonably deems necessary to ensure compliance with this section.

History.

2020, cc. 1215, 1258.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1215 and 1258, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2021, except that the database required by §

6.2-1810

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall be modified to accommodate the provisions of this first enactment of this act by January 1, 2022.”

§ 6.2-1523.3.
Bond required.

An application for a license under this chapter shall be accompanied by a bond filed with the Commissioner with corporate surety authorized to execute such bond in the Commonwealth, in the sum of $25,000, or such greater sum as the Commission may require, but not to exceed a total of $500,000. The form of such bond shall be approved by the Commission. Such bond shall be continuously maintained thereafter in full force. Such bond shall be conditioned upon the applicant or licensee performing all written agreements with borrowers or prospective borrowers, correctly and accurately accounting for all funds received by it in its licensed business, and conducting its licensed business in conformity with this chapter and all applicable laws. Any person who may be damaged by noncompliance of the licensee with any condition of such bond may proceed on such bond against the principal or surety thereon, or both, to recover damages. The aggregate liability under the bond shall not exceed the penal sum of the bond.

History.

2020, cc. 1215, 1258.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1215 and 1258, cl. 4 provides: “That every person licensed under Chapter 15 (§

6.2-1500

et seq.) of Title 6.2 of the Code of Virginia shall, on or before January 1, 2021, file a surety bond with the Commissioner of Financial Institutions that meets the requirements of §

6.2-1523.3

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act.”

Acts 2020, cc. 1215 and 1258, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2021, except that the database required by §

6.2-1810

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall be modified to accommodate the provisions of this first enactment of this act by January 1, 2022.”

§ 6.2-1524.
Required and prohibited activities and conduct.

Each licensee shall maintain at all times the minimum unencumbered liquid assets prescribed by §

6.2-1507

.

A licensee or other person subject to this chapter shall not advertise, display, distribute or broadcast, or cause or permit to be advertised, displayed, distributed or broadcast, in any manner whatsoever, any false, misleading, or deceptive statement or representation with regard to the rates, terms, or conditions for loans made under this chapter. The Commission may require that charges or rates of charge, if stated by a licensee, be stated fully and clearly in such manner as it deems necessary to prevent misunderstanding by prospective borrowers. The Commission may permit or require licensees to refer in their advertising to the fact that their business is under state supervision, subject to conditions imposed by it to prevent false, misleading, or deceptive impression as to the scope or degree of protection provided by this chapter.

A licensee shall not take a lien upon real estate as security for any loan made under the provisions of this chapter, except a lien arising upon rendition of a judgment. Any lien taken in violation of this subsection shall be void.

A licensee shall, at the time any loan is made, deliver to the borrower, or if there are two or more borrowers to one of them, a statement disclosing (i) the names and addresses of the licensee and of the principal debtor on the loan contract, and (ii) a statement in compliance with Consumer Financial Protection Bureau Regulation Z (12 C.F.R. Part 1026).

A licensee shall give the borrower a receipt for all cash payments. The Commission may specify the form and content of such receipts in keeping with the intent and purpose of this chapter.

A licensee shall permit payment to be made in advance in whole, or in part equal to one or more full installments. The licensee may apply the payment first to any amounts that are due and unpaid at the time of such payment.

A licensee shall, upon repayment of the loan in full, (i) mark plainly every obligation and security other than a security agreement executed by the borrower with the word “Paid” or “Canceled,” (ii) mark satisfied any judgment, (iii) restore any pledge, (iv) cancel and return any note and any assignment given by the borrower to the licensee, and (v) release any security agreement or other form of security instrument that no longer secures an outstanding loan between the borrower and the licensee.

In the event of collection by foreclosure sale or otherwise, a licensee shall pay and return to the borrower, or to another person entitled thereto, any surplus arising after the payment of the expenses of collection, sale or foreclosure and satisfaction of the debt.

A licensee shall not take any confession of judgment or any power of attorney running to himself or to any third person to confess judgment or to appear for the borrower in a judicial proceeding. Any such confession of judgment or power of attorney to confess judgment shall be void.

A licensee shall not take any note, promise to pay, or instrument of security in which blanks are left to be filled in after execution, or that does not give the amount of the loan, a clear description of the installment payments required, and the rate of interest charged. A licensee may also include the disclosures required by Consumer Financial Protection Bureau Regulation Z (12 C.F.R. Part 1026) in the note, promise to pay, or instrument of security.

Every loan contract shall be in writing, be signed by the borrower, provide for repayment of the amount loaned in substantially equal monthly installments of principal and interest, and include the following statement: “This loan is made pursuant to Chapter 15 of Title 6.2 of the Code of Virginia”. Nothing contained in this chapter shall prevent (i) a loan being considered a new loan because the proceeds of the loan are used to pay an existing loan contract or (ii) a licensee from entering into a loan contract providing for an odd first payment period of up to 45 days and an odd first payment greater than other monthly payments because of such odd first payment period.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 6-309, 6-310, 6-311, 6-312, 6-313, 6-315; 1956, c. 71; 1966, c. 584, §§ 6.1-279, 6.1-280, 6.1-281, 6.1-282, 6.1-283, 6.1-284.1, 6.1-285; 1968, c. 489; 1974, c. 371; 1983, c. 500; 1987, c. 683, § 6.1-284.1; 1995, c. 2; 1997, c. 113; 2001, c. 308; 2010, c. 794; 2016, c. 501; 2020, cc. 1215, 1258.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1215 and 1258, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2021, except that the database required by §

6.2-1810

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall be modified to accommodate the provisions of this first enactment of this act by January 1, 2022.”

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 501 substituted “Consumer Financial Protection Bureau” for “Federal Reserve Board,” and “1026” for “226” in subsections D and J.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1215 and 1258 are identical, effective January 1, 2021, and in subsection A, inserted “unencumbered liquid” and substituted “§

6.2-1507

” for “this chapter for each license, either (i) in liquid form available for the operation of the business at the location specified in each license or (ii) actually used, whether pledged or not, in the conduct of the business at the location specified in each license”; in the first sentence of subsection K, added “and include the following statement: ‘This loan is made pursuant to Chapter 15 of Title 6.2 of the Code of Virginia”’; and made stylistic changes.

§ 6.2-1525.
Wage purchases.

The payment of any amount in money, credit, goods or things in action, as consideration for any sale or assignment of, or order for, the payment of wages, salary, commission, or other compensation for services, whether earned or to be earned, shall for the purposes of this chapter be deemed a loan of money secured by the sale, assignment or order. The amount by which the compensation so sold, assigned or ordered paid exceeds the amount of consideration actually paid (i) shall be deemed for the purpose of this chapter to be interest upon the loan from the date of the payment to the date the compensation is payable and (ii) shall not, in any case, be more than is sufficient to yield, to the person making the loan, interest on his investment at the annual rate of 10 percent. Such transaction shall in all other respects be governed by and subject to the provisions of this chapter.

History.

Code 1950, § 6-317; 1956, c. 71; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-288; 1968, c. 489; 1974, c. 371; 1995, c. 2; 2001, c. 308; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1526.
Wage assignments.

A valid assignment or order for the payment of future salary, wages, commissions, or other compensation for services may be given as security for a loan made by any licensee, notwithstanding the provisions of any other law to the contrary.

No assignment of, or order for payment of, any salary, wages, commissions, or other compensation for services, earned or to be earned, given to secure any loan made by any licensee shall be valid unless:

The amount of the loan is paid to the borrower simultaneously with its execution; and

The assignment or order is in writing, signed in person by the borrower, and not by an attorney, or if the borrower is married unless it is signed in person by both spouses, and not by an attorney. Written assent of a spouse shall not be required when the spouses have been living separate and apart for a period of at least five months prior to the giving of the assignment or order. The provisions of this section are in addition to, and not in derogation of, the general statutes pertaining to the subject.

Under the assignment or order, an amount equal to not more than 10 percent of the borrower’s salary, wages, commissions, or other compensation for services shall be collectible from the employer of the borrower by the licensee at the time of each payment to the borrower of the salary, wages, commission, or other compensation for services, from the time that a copy of the assignment, verified by the oath of the licensee or his agent, together with a similarly verified statement of the amount unpaid upon the loan and a printed copy of this section, is served upon the employer.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 6-318, 6-319; 1966, c. 584, §§ 6.1-289, 6.1-290; 2010, c. 794; 2020, c. 900.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 900, in subdivision B 2, substituted “spouses” for “husband and wife” in the first sentence and substituted “the spouses” for “husband and wife” in the second sentence.

§ 6.2-1527.
Liens on household furniture.

No chattel mortgage or other lien on household furniture then in the possession and use of the borrower given to secure any loan made by a licensee shall be valid unless it is in writing, signed in person by the borrower, and not by an attorney, or if the borrower is married unless it is signed in person by both spouses, and not by an attorney. Written assent of a spouse shall not be required when the spouses have been living separate and apart for a period of at least five months prior to the giving of the mortgage or lien.

History.

Code 1950, § 6-318; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-289; 2010, c. 794; 2020, c. 900.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 900 substituted “spouses” for “husband and wife” in the first sentence and substituted “the spouses” for “a husband and wife” in the second sentence.

§ 6.2-1528.
Exemptions unimpaired.

Nothing in this chapter shall have the effect of impairing any rights on the part of anyone as to exemptions under the poor debtors law or under any other applicable exemption law now in effect or hereafter enacted.

The provisions of subdivision B 2 of §

6.2-1526

and §

6.2-1527

are in addition to, and not in derogation of, the general statutes pertaining to the subject.

History.

Code 1950, § 6-318; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-289; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1529.
Collection of loans made outside Commonwealth.

No loan made outside the Commonwealth for which greater rates of interest, consideration or charges than are permitted by the law applicable to such loan in the state in which the loan was made, have been charged, contracted for, or received shall be collected in the Commonwealth. Every person in any way participating in an effort to enforce the collection of such loan in the Commonwealth shall be subject to the provisions of this chapter.

History.

Code 1950, § 6-320; 1956, c. 71; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-291; 1968, c. 489; 1974, c. 371; 1995, c. 2; 2001, c. 308; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1530.
Investigations; immunities.

For the purpose of discovering violations of this chapter or securing information lawfully required under it, the Commission may at any time investigate the loans, books and records of any person who:

Is engaged, or appears to the Commission to be engaged, in a business for which the person is required to be licensed and supervised under this chapter;

Advertises for, solicits, or holds itself out as willing to make loans subject to the provisions of this chapter; or

The Commission has reason to believe is violating any provision of this chapter, whether such person shall act or claim to act under or without the authority of this chapter, or as principal, agent, broker, or otherwise.

In furtherance of the investigation the Commission shall:

Have and be given free access to the offices, places of business, books, papers, accounts, records, files, safes, and vaults of all such persons; and

Have authority to require attendance of witnesses and to examine under oath any person whose testimony may be required relative to any such loans or business or to the subject matter of the investigation, examination or hearing.

Before making an investigation as provided for in this section as to any person who is neither licensed nor an applicant for a license under this chapter, an order shall be entered by the Commission. The order shall specifically direct the investigation to be made, command submission by the person whose business is to be investigated, and set forth all other details the Commission finds necessary. The Commission shall not enter such an order except upon (i) at least one affidavit, which may be given by an employee of the Commission or by any other person, (ii) documentary data, (iii) admissions of the person to be investigated, or (iv) any combination of the foregoing, satisfactorily establishing, prima facie, facts sufficient to warrant the investigation provided for by subsection A. If the person involved consents to the investigation, the foregoing requirements may be dispensed with and the investigation may be made upon direction of the Commission or the Commissioner.

No criminal prosecution or action for the imposition of any penalty or forfeiture provided for by this chapter may be maintained against a person not a licensee or an applicant for a license under this chapter who is investigated following entry of an order as provided in subsection C. This subsection shall not:

Prevent prosecution for the violation of any other criminal law or of any other law providing for penalty or forfeiture; and

Provide immunity from prosecution for any officer, agent, or employee of the person whose business is investigated.

If the Commission compels a person not a licensee or an applicant for a license under this chapter to give verbal testimony, the person so compelled to testify shall not be subject to criminal prosecution or the imposition of any penalty or forfeiture in connection with the subject matter as to which such testimony is compelled.

The immunities provided pursuant to subsections D and E shall not impair (i) any civil right of action, not involving penalty or forfeiture, of any person and (ii) the authority of the Attorney General to institute and prosecute a proceeding for injunctive relief as provided for in §

6.2-1537

. Any facts discovered and disclosures made in the course of any investigation following entry of an order as provided in subsection C or verbal testimony compelled as provided in subsection E shall be available in any proceeding involving any civil right of action or for obtaining an injunction under this chapter against the person so investigated or so compelled to testify.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 6-323, 6-324, 6-325, 6-326; 1956, c. 71; 1966, c. 584, §§ 6.1-294, 6.1-295, 6.1-296, 6.1-297; 1968, c. 489; 1974, c. 371; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1531.
Examination.

The Commission shall, as often as it deems to be in the public interest, examine the affairs, business, office, and records of each licensee that pertain to any business licensed under this chapter. Such examination shall be conducted at least once in every three-year period. The licensee shall furnish promptly by mail or otherwise such facts and statements in connection with its business transacted in the Commonwealth that the Commission may request from time to time.

History.

Code 1950, § 6-327; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-298; 1976, c. 658; 1998, c. 44; 2010, c. 794.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Out-of-state lenders. —

No distinction is made between domestic or foreign-based lending entities, and no exception is provided for the loans made under choice-of-law provisions purporting to apply the substantive laws of another state to adjudicate disputes among contracting parties; if the General Assembly intended to exempt out-of-state noncommercial lenders from licensing, it would have so stated. Commonwealth v. NC Fin. Solutions of Utah, LLC, 100 Va. Cir. 232, 2018 Va. Cir. LEXIS 602 (Fairfax County Oct. 28, 2018).

§ 6.2-1532.
Fees for examination, supervision and regulation.

To defray the costs of examination, supervision and regulation of licensed consumer finance companies, every licensee shall pay an annual fee to be calculated in accordance with a schedule set by the Commission. The schedule shall bear a reasonable relationship to the total assets, including loans under this chapter and other loans, of various licensees and their affiliates doing business in authorized consumer finance company offices, to the actual cost of their respective examinations, and to other factors relating to their supervision and regulation. Fees shall be assessed pursuant to this section on or before May 1 of every calendar year. All such fees shall be paid by the licensees to the State Treasurer on or before June 1 following each assessment.

History.

1982, c. 609, § 6.1-299.1; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1533.
Books, accounts, and records; pledge or deposit of notes and securities.

Each licensee shall maintain in its authorized consumer finance company office, or at such other place within or outside the Commonwealth as the Commission may approve, such books, accounts, and records as the Commission may reasonably require to determine whether the licensee is complying with the provisions of this chapter and with regulations adopted in furtherance thereof. Such books, accounts, and records shall be maintained in paper form or, with the Commission’s approval, in any electronic format available for examination on the basis of computer printed reproduction, video display, or other medium. Any books, accounts, and records not maintained in paper form shall be convertible into clearly legible paper documents within a reasonable time. Every licensee shall preserve the books, accounts, and records for at least three years after making the final entry on any loan recorded therein.

If any note or security taken under this chapter shall be pledged as collateral or deposited within or outside the Commonwealth, the licensee shall notify promptly the Commission in writing of the identity and location of the person holding such paper. Prior approval of the Commission shall not be required. Any pledged or deposited paper shall be subject to examination by the Commission in accordance with subsection C as fully as if maintained in an approved location.

All books, accounts, and records shall be subject to examination by the Commission. If such books, accounts, and records are examined outside the Commonwealth, all reasonable costs associated with such examination shall be paid by the licensee.

History.

Code 1950, § 6-329; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-300; 1998, c. 44; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1534.
Annual reports.

Each licensee shall annually, on or before April 1, file a report with the Commission giving such relevant information as may reasonably be required concerning its business and operations during the preceding calendar year as to each authorized consumer finance company office. Reports shall be made under oath and shall be in the form prescribed by the Commission.

History.

Code 1950, § 6-330; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-301; 1968, c. 489; 2000, c. 55; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1535.
Regulations and orders.

The Commission shall adopt such regulations as it deems appropriate to effect the purposes of this chapter. Before adopting any such regulation, the Commission shall give reasonable notice of its content and shall afford interested parties an opportunity to be heard, in accordance with the Commission’s Rules. A copy of each regulation and order adopting it shall be mailed to all licensees at least 10 days before the effective date thereof.

History.

Code 1950, § 6-331; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-302; 1993, c. 366; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1536.
Disclosures in connection with sale of securities.

The Commission may adopt regulations prescribing required disclosures in connection with the offer or sale of any “security,” as that term is defined in §

13.1-501

of the Virginia Securities Act (§

13.1-501

et seq.), issued by any licensee organized under the laws of the Commonwealth.

The disclosures prescribed by subsection A shall be printed in bold, 10-point type and shall contain substantially the following language: “This security or these securities are being offered in Virginia pursuant to an exemption from the registration requirements of the Virginia Securities Act. The State Corporation Commission does not pass upon the adequacy or accuracy of the security or this offering circular or upon the merits of this security or this offering. These securities are not insured or guaranteed by any state or federal agency.”

History.

Code 1950, § 6-331; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-302; 1993, c. 366; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1537.
Authority of Attorney General; impoundment of property and receivership.

Whenever the Attorney General has reasonable cause to believe that (i) any person, not licensed under this chapter, is violating, has violated, is threatening to violate or intends to violate any provision of this chapter or any order or regulation lawfully made pursuant to the authority of this chapter and (ii) the facts justify it, the Attorney General shall institute and prosecute a lawsuit for monetary or injunctive relief or both in the Circuit Court of the City of Richmond, in the name of the Commonwealth. The court may grant monetary relief or may enjoin and restrain or both any such person from engaging in or continuing any such violation or from doing any act or acts in furtherance thereof. In any such suit a decree or order may be entered awarding such monetary relief or preliminary or final injunctive relief as may be deemed proper.

In addition to all other means provided by law for the enforcement of an award of monetary relief, a temporary restraining order, temporary injunction, or final injunction, the court may impound, and appoint a receiver for, (i) the property and business of the defendant, including books, papers, documents, and records pertaining thereto, (ii) so much thereof as the court deems reasonably necessary to prevent further violation of this chapter through or by means of the use of such property and business, or (iii) so much thereof as is necessary to identify borrowers who have been damaged and the amount of their damages, and to refund the amount of any such damages to the borrowers pursuant to subsection C. The receiver, when appointed and qualified, shall have such powers and duties as to custody, collection, administration, payment of debts and liquidation of the property and business as from time to time are conferred upon him by the court.

The Attorney General may seek and the circuit court may order or decree such other relief allowed by law, including restitution to the extent available to borrowers under §

6.2-1541

.

In any action brought by the Attorney General by virtue of the authority granted in this section, the Attorney General shall be entitled to seek attorney fees and costs.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to preclude any person who suffers a loss as a result of a violation of §

6.2-1501

from maintaining an action to recover damages or restitution under §

6.2-1541

.

No individual shall be entitled to refuse to testify in a suit brought under this section because the person’s testimony would tend to incriminate such person or subject the individual to penalty or forfeiture. If called to testify by the Commonwealth or by the court trying the case, the individual may not thereafter be prosecuted for any crime or subjected to any penalty or forfeiture growing out of the transaction concerning which the individual testifies.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 6-322, 6-333; 1966, c. 584, §§ 6.1-303, 6.1-304; 1988, c. 186; 1992, c. 9; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1538.
Copies of orders or licenses.

On application of any person, and payment of the costs, the Commission shall furnish such person with a certified copy of any order entered or license issued by it. Such copy shall be prima facie evidence in any court or proceeding of the fact of the entry of the order or of the issuance of the license.

History.

Code 1950, § 6-334; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-305; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1539.
Review by Commission.

In addition to any other remedy he may have any licensee or any other person considering himself aggrieved by any action of the Commissioner under this chapter pursuant to authority conferred upon him or delegated to him by the Commission may, within 30 days of the action complained of, file a petition as a matter of right with the Commission to review the action. The proceeding on review shall be de novo and the record and summary of the evidence before, and findings of, the Commissioner shall be admissible as evidence before the Commission.

History.

Code 1950, § 6-335; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-306; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1540.
Criminal penalties.

Any person, including the members, officers, directors, agents, and employees of an entity, who violates or participates in the violation of any provision of §

6.2-1501

is guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, § 6-337; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-308; 1986, c. 502; 2010, c. 794.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 2 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 6.2-1541.
Unlawful contracts void; recovery of amounts paid.

A loan contract shall be void if any act has been done in the making or collection thereof that violates §

6.2-1501

.

The lender on any loan for which a person has taken any action in its making or collection in violation of §

6.2-1501

shall not collect, receive, or retain any principal, interest, or charges whatsoever with respect to the loan, and any principal or interest paid on the loan shall be recoverable by the person by or for whom payment was made.

History.

Code 1950, § 6-337; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-308; 1986, c. 502; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1542.
Duty to refund unauthorized or excess charges; liability to borrower for penalty.

If any amount not authorized by this chapter or in excess of the charges permitted by this chapter is charged and received by a licensee, such unauthorized or excess charge actually received by a licensee shall be refunded to the borrower or credited to the borrower’s account.

Except for excess charges charged and received as the result of a bona fide error of computation that was not made pursuant to a regular course of dealing, the licensee shall be liable to the borrower for a penalty of twice the amount of any unauthorized or excess charge actually received by the licensee and for any court costs and reasonable attorney fees incurred by the borrower.

History.

Code 1950, § 6-338; 1956, c. 71; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-309; 1976, c. 658; 1986, c. 502; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1543.
Civil penalties.

The Commission may impose a civil penalty not exceeding $10,000 upon any licensee who it determines, in proceedings conducted in accordance with the Commission’s Rules, has violated any provision of this chapter or of any regulation or order of the Commission, either knowingly or without the exercise of due care to prevent the violation. In any proceeding under this section, a licensee shall not be penalized for any act or omission done in reasonable reliance on any regulation, order, letter, or other written directive or request of the Commission.

History.

Code 1950, § 6-338; 1956, c. 71; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-309; 1976, c. 658; 1986, c. 502; 2010, c. 794.